Utah statutes.
9-4-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Accessible housing" means housing which has been constructed or modified
to be accessible, as described in the construction codes adopted under Section
58-56-4.
(2)  "Director" means the director of the division.
(3)  "Division" means the Division of Housing and Community Development.
